District of Columbia statutes.
16-2325.02

Report on failure of respondents to appear in delinquency cases.

The Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall submit to the Council a semiannual report detailing the number of respondents in delinquency cases who fail to appear before any court or judicial official as required and the percentage that represents of those adjudicated. For each failure to appear, the report shall include the age of the respondent, the underlying offense with which the respondent was charged, and whether the respondent had previously failed to appear.

Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 206(d), 53 DCR 8610
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).